pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Equestre > Cuidados com cavalos > Escovagem de cavalos > Luvas, escovas e pentes para escovagem de cavalos: Escovas para cavalos; Pentes para cavalos; Artigos para a muda do pelo para cavalos; Luvas para escovar cavalos; Artigos para escovar cavalos; Facas de aparar para cavalos
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Echitație > Îngrijirea cailor > Întreținerea cailor > Piepteni, perii și mănuși pentru întreținerea cailor: Perii pentru întreținerea cailor; Piepteni pentru întreținerea cailor; Mănuși pentru îndepărtarea părului pentru întreținerea cailor; Mănuși pentru întreținerea cailor; Dispozitive pentru întreținerea cailor; Cuțite pentru întreținerea cailor
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Конен спорт > Грижа за коне > Подстригване на коне > Гребени, четки и ръкавици за коне: Четки за коне; Гребени за коне; Фурминатори за коне; Ръкавици за коне; Консумативи за подстригване на коне; Ножове за подстригване на коне
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ιππασία > Φροντίδα αλόγων > Καλλωπισμός αλόγων > Χτένες, βούρτσες & γάντια καλλωπισμού για άλογα: Βούρτσες καλλωπισμού αλόγων; Χτένες καλλωπισμού αλόγων; Χτένες αποτρίχωσης για άλογα; Γάντια καλλωπισμού αλόγων; Εργαλεία καλλωπισμού για άλογα; Μαχαίρια κουρέματος καλλωπισμού για άλογα
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Equitación > Cuidado de caballos > Acicalamiento de caballos > Peines, cepillos y guantes para acicalar caballos: Cepillos para acicalar caballos; Peines para acicalar caballos; Desparasitadores para caballos; Guantes para acicalar caballos; Peluquerías para caballos; Cuchillas para acicalar caballos
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Jeździectwo > Produkty do pielęgnacji koni > Artykuły do pielęgnacji koni > Rękawice, szczotki i grzebienie do czyszczenia koni: Szczotki do czyszczenia koni; Grzebienie do czyszczenia koni; Urządzenia do wyczesywania podszerstka; Rękawice do pielęgnacji koni; Pielęgnacja koni; Noże do przycinania do pielęgnacji koni
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Jojimo sportas > Žirgų priežiūra > Žirgų priežiūra > Šukos, šepečiai ir pirštinės žirgams: Šepečiai žirgams; Šukos žirgams; Besišeriančio kailio priežiūros priemonės žirgams; Šukavimo pirštinės žirgams; Žirgų priežiūros priemonės; Žirgų priežiūros peiliai
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Équitation > Articles pour chevaux > Articles de toilettage pour chevaux > Peignes, brosses et gants de toilettage: Brosses de toilettage pour chevaux; Peignes de toilettage pour chevaux; Brosses anti-mue de toilettage pour chevaux; Gants de toilettage pour chevaux; Soins de toilettage pour chevaux; Couteaux de toilettage pour chevaux
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Hästsport > Hästutrustning > Hästryktning > Ryktborstar och mankammar för hästar: Hästryktningsborstar; Hästryktningskammar; Hästryktningsavhårare; Hästryktningshandskar; Hästryktningsgroomers; Hästryktningstrimknivar
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Hestesport > Hestepleie > Hesterøkting > Kammer, børster og vanter for hestepleie: Børster for hesterøkting; Kammer for hesterøkting; Skraper for hesterøkting; Hansker for hesterøkting; Pleiesteiner for hesterøkting; Trimmekniver for hesterøkting
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Jezdectví > Potřeby pro koně > Péče o koně > Hříbla, kartáče a rukavice pro péči o koně: Péče o koně – kartáče; Péče o koně – hřebeny; Péče o koně – vyčesávací hřebeny; Péče o koně – rukavice; Péče o koně – hřebeny na srst; Péče o koně – trimovací nože
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การขี่ม้า > การดูแลม้า > อุปกรณ์เสริมสวยสำหรับม้า > หวี แปรง และถุงมือดูแลม้า: แปรงขนม้า; หวีขนม้า; เครื่องตัดขนม้า; ถุงมือดูแลม้า; อุปกรณ์ดูแลม้า; มีดตัดแต่งขนม้า
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 馬術運動 > 馬匹照護用品 > 馬梳 > 馬匹清潔梳子/毛刷/手套: 馬匹清潔刷; 馬匹清潔梳; 馬匹清潔除毛機; 馬匹清潔手套; 馬匹清潔美容用品; 馬匹美容修剪刀
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 승마 > 말 관리 > 말털 손질용품 > 말 그루밍 빗/브러시/미트: 말 그루밍 브러시; 말 그루밍 빗; 말 그루밍 디쉐딩 브러시; 말 그루밍 장갑; 말 그루밍 그루머; 말 그루밍 손질용 칼
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Paardensport > Verzorging van paarden > Paardenverzorging > Kammen, borstels en handschoenen voor paardenverzorging: Borstels voor paardenverzorging; Kammen voor paardenverzorging; Deshedders voor paardenverzorging; Handschoenen voor paardenverzorging; Trimmers voor paardenverzorging; Trimmessen voor paardenverzorging
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Jazdectvo > Starostlivosť o kone > Starostlivosť o kone > Hrebene, kefy a rukavice pre kone: Kefy pre kone; Hrebene pre kone; Trimovacie čepele pre kone; Rukavice pre kone; Pomôcky na starostlivosť o kone; Trimovacie nože pre kone
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Ratsastus > Hevostenhoito > Hevosen hoitaminen > Hevosen kammat, harjat ja suat: Hevosen harjat; Hevosen kammat; Hevosen karvaharjat; Hevosen hoitohanskat; Hevosen hoitosuat; Hevosen hoitoveitset
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Equitazione > Cura dei cavalli > Strigliatura cavalli > Pettini, spazzole e guanti per la strigliatura dei cavalli: Spazzole per toelettatura cavalli; Pettini per toelettatura cavalli; Attrezzo per toelettatura cavalli; Guanti per toelettatura cavalli; Acconciatori per toelettatura cavalli; Coltelli da rifinitura per toelettatura cavalli
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Cưỡi ngựa > Chăm sóc ngựa > Chải lông ngựa > Lược, bàn chải cho ngựa và găng tay hở ngón: Bàn chải lông ngựa; Lược chải lông ngựa; Lược chải ngăn rụng lông ngựa; Găng tay chải lông ngựa; Dụng cụ cắt tỉa lông ngựa; Dao cắt tỉa lông ngựa
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 马术用品 > 马匹护理用品 > 马毛梳洗 > 马毛梳洗梳子、刷子与手套: 马毛梳洗刷; 马毛梳洗梳子; 马毛梳洗除毛机; 马毛梳洗手套; 马毛梳洗美容仪; 马毛梳洗修剪刀
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Equestrian > Horse Care > Horse Grooming > Horse Grooming Combs, Brushes & Mitts: Horse Grooming Brushes; Horse Grooming Combs; Horse Grooming Deshedders; Horse Grooming Gloves; Horse Grooming Groomers; Horse Grooming Trimming Knives
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Jahanje > Njega konja > Timarenje konja > Češljevi, četke i rukavice za timarenje konja: Četke za timarenje konja; Češljevi za timarenje konja; Mašinice za timarenje konja; Rukavice za timarenje konja; Alati za timarenje konja; Noževi za timarenje konja
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Binicilik > At Bakım Ürünleri > At Tımarlama > At Tımar Tarakları, Fırçaları ve Eldivenleri: At Tımar Fırçaları; At Tımar Tarakları; At Tımar Makinaları; At Tımar Eldivenleri; At Tımarı; At Tımar Kırpma Bıçakları
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 乗馬 > 馬用品 > 馬用グルーミング用品 > 馬用グルーミングコーム・ブラシ: 馬用グルーミングブラシ; 馬用グルーミングコーム; 馬のグルーミングデシェッダー; 馬用グルーミンググローブ; 馬のグルーミンググルーマー; 馬の手入れ用トリミングナイフ
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Lovaglás > Lógondozás > Lóápolás > Lóápolási fésűk, kefék és kesztyűk: Lóápolási kefék; Lóápolási fésűk; Lóápolási szőrtelenítők; Lóápolási kesztyűk; Lóápolási ápolók; Lóápolási vágókések
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Reitsportzubehör > Pferdebedarf > Pferdehaarpflege > Kämme, Bürsten & Striegel: Pferdehaarbürsten; Pferdehaarkämme; Pferdehaar-Entfilzer; Fellpflege-Handschuh; Pferdepflegebürsten; Pferdehaar-Trimmmesser
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Конный спорт > Товары для ухода за лошадьми > Уход за лошадьми > Расчески, щетки и перчатки для вычесывания лошадей: Щетки для лошадей; Расчески для лошадей; Дешеддеры для лошадей; Перчатки для вычесывания шерсти у лошадей; Скребницы для лошадей; Ножи для тримминга для лошадей
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Dressur > Produkter til hestepleje > Hestepleje > Kamme, børster og handsker til strigling: Hesteplejebørster; Hesteplejekamme; Hesteplejeaffældere; Hesteplejehandsker; Hesteplejegroomere; Trimmeknive til hestepleje
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Esportes equestres > Suprimentos para cavalos > Grooming de cavalos > Pentes, escovas e luvas para cuidados com cavalos: Escovas para cuidados com cavalos; Pentes para cuidados com cavalos; Desembaraçadores para cuidados com cavalos; Luvas para cuidados com cavalos; Tosadores para cuidados com cavalos; Aparadores para cuidados com cavalos
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Jahanje > Nega konj > Urejanje konj > Glavniki, krtače in rokavice za nego konj: Krtače za nego konjske dlake; Glavniki za nego konjske dlake; Pripomočki za odstranjevanje odmrle konjske dlake; Rokavice za nego konjske dlake; Pripomočki za nego konjske dlake; Nož za oblikovanje konjske dlake